Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 47.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
71-5714
Tobacco Prevention
and Control Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Tobacco Prevention and Control Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be used
for a comprehensive statewide tobacco-related public health program administered
by the Department of Health and Human Services which includes, but is not
limited to (1) community programs to reduce tobacco use, (2) chronic disease
programs, (3) school programs, (4) statewide programs, (5) enforcement, (6)
counter marketing, (7) cessation programs, (8) surveillance and evaluation,
and (9) administration. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Tobacco Prevention and Control Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

The State Treasurer shall
transfer, on or before June 30, 2010, as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, one million
three hundred thousand dollars from the Tobacco Prevention and Control Cash
Fund to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 2000, LB 1436, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 412, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 56;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 633;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB2, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 47.
November 21, 2009The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB2, section 2, with LB3, section 47, to reflect all amendments.
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.